Florida, session 2026, SB874.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSubsection (5) of section 472.015, Florida 16 Statutes, is amended to read: 17 472.015âLicensure.â 18 (5)(a)âThe board shall certify as qualified for a license 19 by endorsement an applicant who, at the time of application: 20 1.âHolds a valid license to practice surveying and mapping 21 issued before July 1, 1999, by another state or territory of the 22 United States; has passed a national, regional, state, or 23 territorial licensing examination that is substantially 24 equivalent to the examination required by s. 472.013; and has a 25 specific experience record of at least 8 years as a subordinate 26 to a registered surveyor and mapper in the active practice of 27 surveying and mapping, 6 years of which must be of a nature 28 indicating that the applicant was in responsible charge of the 29 accuracy and correctness of the surveying and mapping work 30 performed; or 31 2.âHolds a valid license to practice surveying and mapping 32 issued by another state or territory of the United States if the 33 criteria for issuance of the license were substantially the same 34 as the licensure criteria that existed in Florida at the time 35 the license was issued; or 36 3.âHolds a valid license to practice surveying and mapping 37 issued by another state or territory of the United States, is 38 currently in good standing with such licensing authority, and 39 has a specific experience record of at least 5 years as a 40 registered surveyor and mapper in the active practice of 41 surveying and mapping, which must be of a nature indicating that 42 the applicant was in responsible charge of the accuracy and 43 correctness of the surveying and mapping work performed. 44 (b)âAll applicants for licensure by endorsement must pass 45 the Florida law and rules portion of the examination prior to 46 licensure. 47 (c)âFor purposes of determining whether an applicant is in 48 good standing under subparagraph (a)3., the board may require 49 documentation, verification, or certification from the issuing 50 authority, and may independently evaluate disciplinary, 51 regulatory, or competency records maintained by such authority 52 or other reliable sources. The board may adopt rules to 53 implement this section in a manner consistent with s. 472.008. 54 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.